ja: 互換性のあるビリヤードテーブルサイズ: 10フィート; 12フィート; 6フィート; 6.5フィート; 7フィート; 7.5フィート; 8フィート; 8.5フィート; 9フィート; カスタム; 特大; 汎用; その他
sl-SI: Velikost združljive biljardne mize: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Po meri; Nadstandardna velikost; Univerzalno; Drugo
lt-LT: Suderinamas biliardo stalo dydis: 10 pėd.; 12 pėd.; 6 pėd.; 6,5 pėd.; 7 pėd.; 7,5 pėd.; 8 pėd.; 8,5 pėd.; 9 pėd.; Pasirinktinis; Padidintas; Universalus; Kita
ro-RO: Dimensiunea mesei de biliard compatibile: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 6.5 ft; 7 ft; 7.5 ft; 8 ft; 8.5 ft; 9 ft; Personalizat; Supradimensionat; Universal; Altele
pt-BR: Tamanho de mesa de bilhar compatível: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 6.5 ft; 7 ft; 7.5 ft; 8 ft; 8.5 ft; 9 ft; Personalizado; Extragrande; Universal; Outro
nb: Kompatibel biljardbordstørrelse: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Spesialtilpasset; Overdimensjonert; Universal; Annet
fr: Taille de table de billard compatible: 10 pi; 12 pi; 6 pi; 6,5 pi; 7 pi; 7,5 pi; 8 pi; 8,5 pi; 9 pi; Personnalisé; Surdimensionné; Universel; Autre
cs: Kompatibilní velikost kulečníkového stolu: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Vlastní; Nadměrná velikost; Univerzální; Ostatní
en: Compatible billiard table size: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 6.5 ft; 7 ft; 7.5 ft; 8 ft; 8.5 ft; 9 ft; Custom; Oversized; Universal; Other
th: ขนาดโต๊ะบิลเลียดที่เข้ากันได้: 10 ฟุต; 12 ฟุต; 6 ฟุต; 6.5 ฟุต; 7 ฟุต; 7.5 ฟุต; 8 ฟุต; 8.5 ฟุต; 9 ฟุต; กำหนดเอง; ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษ; ขนาดมาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Съвместим размер на билярдна маса: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 6.5 ft; 7 ft; 7.5 ft; 8 ft; 8.5 ft; 9 ft; Персонализиран; Свръхразмер; Универсален; Друго
nl: Compatibele biljarttafel maat: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Aangepast; Oversized; Universeel; Overige
sk-SK: Kompatibilná veľkosť biliardového stola: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Vlastná veľkosť; Nadmerná veľkosť; Univerzálne; Iné
vi: Kích thước bàn bi-a tương thích: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Tùy chỉnh; Quá khổ; Phổ quát; Khác
ko: 호환되는 당구대 사이즈: 10피트; 12피트; 6피트; 6.5피트; 7피트; 7.5피트; 8피트; 8.5피트; 9피트; 맞춤형; 특대형; 범용; 기타
el: Συμβατό μέγεθος τραπεζιού μπιλιάρδου: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Προσαρμοσμένο; Υπερμεγέθες; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
zh-CN: 适配的台球桌尺寸: 10 英尺; 12 英尺; 6 英尺; 6.5 英尺; 7 英尺; 7.5 英尺; 8 英尺; 8.5 英尺; 9 英尺; 定制; 加大; 通用型; 其他
hr-HR: Kompatibilna veličina biljarskog stola: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Prilagođeno; Predimenzionirano; Univerzalno; Ostalo
sv: Kompatibel biljardbordsstorlek: 10 fot; 12 fot; 6 fot; 6,5 fot; 7 fot; 7,5 fot; 8 fot; 8,5 fot; 9 fot; Anpassad; Överdimensionerad; Universell; Övrigt
pl: Kompatybilny rozmiar stołu bilardowego: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Niestandardowy; Powiększony; Uniwersalny; Inny
ru: Совместимый размер бильярдного стола: 10 футов; 12 футов; 6 футов; 6,5 футов; 7 футов; 7,5 футов; 8 футов; 8,5 футов; 9 футов; Нестандартный; Увеличенный; Универсальный; Другое
fi: Yhteensopivan biljardipöydän koko: 10 jalkaa; 12 jalkaa; 6 jalkaa; 6,5 jalkaa; 7 jalkaa; 7,5 jalkaa; 8 jalkaa; 8,5 jalkaa; 9 jalkaa; Mukautettu; Ylisuuri; Yleinen; Muu
it: Piatto da biliardo compatibile: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Personalizzato; Fuori misura; Universale; Altro
zh-TW: 相容撞球桌尺寸: 10 呎; 12 呎; 6 呎; 6.5 呎; 7 呎; 7.5 呎; 8 呎; 8.5 呎; 9 呎; 自訂; 特大; 通用; 其他
pt-PT: Tamanho de mesa de bilhar compatível: 10 pés; 12 pés; 6 pés; 6,5 pés; 7 pés; 7,5 pés; 8 pés; 8,5 pés; 9 pés; Personalizado; Sobredimensionada; Universal; Outro
tr: Uyumlu bilardo masası boyutu: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Özel; Büyük boy; Evrensel; Diğer
de: Kompatible Billardtischgröße: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Benutzerdefiniert; Übergröße; Universell; Sonstige
es: Tamaño de mesa de billar compatible: 10 pies; 12 pies; 6 pies; 6,5 pies; 7 pies; 7,5 pies; 8 pies; 8,5 pies; 9 pies; Personalizado; De gran tamaño; Universal; Otro
hu: Kompatibilis biliárdasztal-méret: 10 láb; 12 láb; 6 láb; 6,5 láb; 7 láb; 7,5 láb; 8 láb; 8,5 láb; 9 láb; Egyéni; Túlméretes; Univerzális; Egyéb
da: Kompatibelt billardbords størrelse: 10 fod; 12 fod; 6 fod; 6,5 fod; 7 fod; 7,5 fod; 8 fod; 8,5 fod; 9 fod; Specialfremstillet; Oversize; Universel; Andet